Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
PART 1 General Provisions

32-10-1.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Approach” means not more than three miles of the traffic artery on either end of the bridge and within that limit shall mean so much of the traffic arteries on either end of the bridge as shall be required to develop the maximum traffic capacity of the bridge, including necessary grading, paving, drainage structures or facilities, and other construction necessary to the approach.

“Authority” means the public corporation created by the “Georgia Highway Authority Act,” Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, as amended by Ga. L. 1971, p. 385, and by Ga. L. 1972, p. 826, which 1967 Act merged the public corporation known as the Georgia Rural Roads Authority created by the “Georgia Rural Roads Authority Act,” Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, as amended, with the Georgia State Highway Authority, created by the “Georgia State Highway Authority Act,” Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, as amended particularly by Ga. L. 1961, p. 3, and which 1967 Act provided that all property, assets, choses in action, or other things of value of both of the constituent public corporations shall be vested in and be the property of the Georgia Highway Authority (the continuing and surviving public corporation); all the rights, powers, and duties, including their perpetual existence, previously legally granted to both constituent public corporations, shall be vested in the Georgia Highway Authority, subject, however, to all debts, obligations, liabilities, and duties incurred by the two constituent public corporations; the purpose and intention of such merger was that the Georgia Highway Authority as the successor and continuing corporation would be for the continuation of all the purposes of both constituent public corporations and would be vested with the rights, powers, duties, and obligations of both constituent public corporations, together with the additional powers and rights granted by the aforesaid “Georgia Highway Authority Act” of 1967.

“Board” means the State Transportation Board or the commissioner of transportation acting as the chief executive officer of the Department of Transportation; and, whenever any action is required to be taken, any power is permitted to be exercised, any approval is to be granted, or any contract is to be executed by the State Transportation Board, pursuant to any provision of this article, the same may be taken, exercised, granted, or executed by the commissioner to the extent permitted by law.

“Bonds and revenue bonds” means any bonds issued by the authority or either of the constituent public corporations, whether issued under this article or otherwise, including refunding bonds.

“Bridge” means a structure, including the approaches thereto, erected in order:

To afford unrestricted vehicular passage over obstructions in any public road, including but not limited to rivers, streams, ponds, lakes, bays, ravines, gullies, railroads, public highways, and canals; or

To afford unrestricted vehicular passage under or over existing railroads and public roads.

“Cost of project or projects” means the cost of construction; the cost of all lands, properties, franchises, and rights in property; the cost of all machinery and equipment necessary for the operation of a project; financing charges; interest prior to and during construction; cost of engineering, plans and specifications, surveys, and supervision; legal expenses; expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of the project; administrative expenses; fiscal expense; such other expense as may be necessary or incident to the financing authorized by this article; the expense of construction or any action permitted by this article with respect to a particular project and the placing of the same in operation; and any other expense authorized by this article to be incurred by the authority with respect to any action with regard to a particular project or projects. Any obligation or expense incurred for any of the foregoing purposes shall be regarded as a cost of the project and may be paid or reimbursed as such out of the proceeds of bonds issued under this article for such project or group of projects.

“County road” means any public road or portion thereof, not located wholly within the boundaries of an incorporated municipality and not now, or as of the particular time of inquiry in the future, part of a state road or urban road as defined in paragraphs (12) and (15), respectively, of this Code section. The term shall include not only such roads as come within this definition on July 1, 1973, but also such roads, as defined in this Code section, which may from time to time be planned, laid out, and constructed by the authority pursuant to this article. The fact that a road owned by the authority and leased to the state may, as provided by this article, be declared part of the state highway system shall not destroy its identity as a county road for the purposes of this article, provided that nothing in the definition of “county road” shall in any manner alter the legal effect of said term which is intended to be synonymous with “rural road” as used in the “Georgia Highway Authority Act,” Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, as amended.

“Governing authority of a county” means the commissioner, board of commissioners, commission, or other person or body of persons at the time entrusted by law with the administration of the fiscal affairs of any county.

“Governing authority of any incorporated municipality” means the mayor, board of aldermen, city council, board, council, commission, or other person or body of persons at the time entrusted by law with the administration of the fiscal affairs of any incorporated municipality.

“Project” means:

A continuous length or stretch of state road, including bridges thereon, as to which the authority has undertaken or agreed to undertake any action permitted by the terms of this article or as to which any such action has been completed by the authority;

A continuous length or stretch of county road, including bridges thereon, as to which the authority has undertaken or agreed to undertake any action permitted by the terms of this article or as to which any such action has been completed by the authority;

A continuous length or stretch of urban road, including bridges thereon, as to which the authority has undertaken or agreed to undertake any action permitted by the terms of this article or as to which any such action has been completed by the authority;

One or more bridges, as defined in paragraph (5) of this Code section, together with the approaches thereto, as defined in paragraph (1) of this Code section; and

A project undertaken pursuant to a public-private initiative as authorized pursuant to Code Section 32-2-78.

“Self-liquidating” means a project or group of projects whose revenues, rents, and earnings derived by the authority therefrom will be sufficient to pay, in the judgment of the authority, the principal of and interest on bonds which may be issued for the cost of such project or group of projects and to pay the cost of maintaining, repairing, and operating the projects or combination of projects and other lawful expenses of the authority.

“State road” means any public road or portion thereof which is part of the state highway system or The Dwight D. Eisenhower System of Interstate and Defense Highways.

“Urban county” means any county with a population of more than 50,000 according to the most recent official United States census.

“Urban incorporated municipality” means a municipal corporation incorporated and chartered pursuant to an Act of the General Assembly and which has a population of 5,000 or more according to the most recent official United States census.

“Urban road” means any public road or portion thereof located:

Anywhere wholly within the boundaries of an urban county; or

Wholly or partly within an urban incorporated municipality within the boundaries of a county with a population under 50,000 according to the most recent official United States census and extending no more than two miles outside of such urban incorporated municipality.

The term shall include not only such roads as come within this definition on or after July 1, 1973, but also such roads as defined in this Code section which may from time to time be planned, laid out, and constructed by the authority pursuant to this article. The fact that a road owned by the authority and leased to the state may be declared part of the state highway system, as provided by this article, shall not destroy its identity as an urban road for the purposes of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, § 3; Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 2; Ga. L. 1961, p. 3, § 3; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 3; Ga. L. 1971, p. 385, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 826, § 1; Code 1933, § 95A-1201, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 32; Ga. L. 2000, p. 136, § 32; Ga. L. 2005, p. 601, § 11/SB 160; Ga. L. 2005, p. 902, § 4/SB 270.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1991, commas were inserted following “(15)” and “respectively” in the first sentence of paragraph (7).

32-10-2.
Continuation of Georgia Highway Authority; preservation of authority’s powers; protection of rights of bondholders generally.

The Georgia Highway Authority shall continue to be a body corporate and politic and an instrumentality and public corporation of this state known as the “Georgia Highway Authority.” It shall continue to have perpetual existence. In this name it may contract and be contracted with, sue and be sued, implead and be impleaded, and complain and defend in all courts subject to the limitations of Code Section 32-10-50.

Except as provided in this article, the powers granted by law prior to July 1, 1973, to the Georgia Highway Authority to carry out the purpose for which it was originally created shall not be impaired or diminished. Furthermore, no provision of this article is intended to diminish or impair, nor shall any provision be construed as diminishing or impairing, the rights of the holders of any bonds issued by the Georgia Rural Roads Authority or the Georgia Highway Authority or of the holders of any bonds issued by the Georgia Highway Authority outstanding before July 1, 1973; and should it be determined that any provision of this article does diminish or impair any such right in any manner, such provision is declared to be ineffective to that extent but shall be effective for all other purposes.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, § 2; Ga. L. 1959, p. 11, § 2; Ga. L. 1961, p. 3, § 2; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 2; Code 1933, § 95A-1202, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-3.
Members; compensation; officers; quorum; record of proceedings.

The members of the Georgia Highway Authority shall be ex officio the Governor, the commissioner of transportation, and the director of the Office of Planning and Budget; and membership on the authority shall be a separate and distinct duty for which they shall receive no additional compensation. All members of the authority shall be entitled to all actual expenses necessarily incurred while in the performance of their duties on behalf of the authority.

The authority shall elect one of its members as chairman. It shall also elect a secretary and a treasurer, who need not necessarily be members of the authority. The authority may make such bylaws for its government as is deemed necessary but it is under no duty to do so. A majority of the members of the authority shall constitute a quorum necessary for the transaction of business, and a majority vote of those present at any meeting at which there is a quorum shall be sufficient to do and perform any action permitted to the authority by this article.

No vacancy on the authority shall impair the right of the quorum to transact any and all business as stated in this Code section. Members of the authority shall be accountable as trustees. They shall cause to be kept adequate books and records of all transactions of the authority, including books of income and disbursements of every nature. The books and records shall be inspected and audited by the state auditor at least once a year.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, § 2; Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 4; Ga. L. 1959, p. 13, § 2; Ga. L. 1961, p. 3, § 2; Ga. L. 1963, p. 284, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 2; Code 1933, § 95A-1203, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32.

32-10-4.
Powers of authority generally.

The authority shall have, in addition to any other powers conferred in this article, the following powers:

To have a seal and alter the same at its pleasure;

To acquire by purchase, exchange, lease, or otherwise and to hold, lease, and dispose of, in any manner, real and personal property of every kind and character for its corporate purposes;

To appoint such additional officers, who need not be members of the authority, as the authority deems advisable; to employ such experts, agents, and employees as may be in its judgment necessary to carry on properly the business of the authority; to fix the compensation for such officers, experts, agents, and employees and to promote and discharge same; provided, however, that the total compensation paid such persons shall not exceed the sum of $100,000.00 per year;

To make such contracts and agreements as the legitimate and necessary purposes of this article shall require, to execute and perform lease contracts for projects as permitted by this article, and to make all other contracts and agreements as may be necessary to the proper performance of any action permitted by this article;

To build, rebuild, relocate, construct, reconstruct, surface, resurface, lay out, grade, repair, improve, widen, straighten, operate, own, maintain, lease, and manage projects located on property conveyed to the authority as authorized in Code Section 32-10-5, and to pay the cost in whole or in part of any such action or actions from the proceeds of bonds;

To borrow money for any of its corporate purposes and to issue bonds for such purposes as provided in Code Section 32-10-30;

To exercise any power granted to private corporations not in conflict with the Constitution and laws of Georgia nor with other provisions of this article;

By or through its agents or employees, to enter upon any lands, waters, and premises in the state for the purpose of making surveys, soundings, drillings, and examinations as the authority may deem necessary or convenient for the purposes of this article; and such entry shall not be deemed a trespass. The authority shall, however, make reimbursement for any actual damage resulting from such activities;

To make reasonable regulations for the installation, construction, maintenance, repair, renewal, removal, and relocation of pipes, mains, conduits, cables, wires, poles, towers, tracts, and other equipment and appliances of any public utility in, on, along, over, and under any project;

To do and perform all things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers conferred upon the authority by this article;

To prescribe rules and regulations as approved by the department for the operation of each project constructed under this article, including rules and regulations to ensure maximum use of each such project; and

To incorporate one or more nonprofit corporations as subsidiary corporations of the authority for the purpose of carrying out any of the powers of the authority and to accomplish any of the purposes of the authority. Any such subsidiary corporation shall be a nonprofit corporation, a body corporate and politic, and an instrumentality and public corporation of the state and shall exercise essential governmental functions. Any subsidiary corporations created pursuant to this power shall be created pursuant to Chapter 3 of Title 14, the “Georgia Nonprofit Corporation Code,” and shall be filed with the Secretary of State, who shall be authorized to accept such filings. The commissioner and two individuals appointed by the members of the authority shall constitute the members of and shall serve as directors of any subsidiary corporation, and such appointment shall not constitute a conflict of interest, provided that the provisions of subsection (a) of Code Section 45-10-23 or any other law shall not prevent full-time employees of the authority or the Department of Transportation from serving as members of the governing board of such subsidiary corporation. Upon dissolution of any subsidiary corporation of the authority, any assets shall revert to the authority or to any successor to the authority or, failing such succession, to the state, provided that any toll collection or other tollway operations remain under the authority of the State Road and Tollway Authority. The authority shall not be liable for the debts, obligations, or bonds of any subsidiary corporation or for the actions or omissions to act of any subsidiary corporation unless the authority in writing expressly so consents.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, § 4; Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 5; Ga. L. 1961, p. 3, § 4; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 4; Ga. L. 1971, p. 385, § 6; Code 1933, § 95A-1204, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1215, § 4; Ga. L. 2005, p. 902, § 5/SB 270.

Cross references.

Prohibition against authorizing construction or maintenance of private road, §

32-1-8

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 1215,
which enacted Code Sections 12-5-41, 32-5-24, and 45-12-170, and amended Code Sections 20-2-553 and 32-10-4, provided that it shall be known and may be cited as the “Planned Growth and Development Act of 1974.”

32-10-5.
Conveyance of property to authority.

The Governor is authorized and empowered to convey to the authority, on behalf of the state, any real property or interest therein or any rights of way owned by the state, including property or rights of way acquired in the name of the department or board, which is used at the time, or may be used upon completion of any action committed to the authority by this article, as a state road, a county road, or an urban road. The consideration for such conveyance shall be determined by the Governor and expressed in the deed of conveyance; however, such consideration shall be nominal, the benefits flowing to the state and its citizens constituting full and adequate actual consideration.

The governing authority of any political subdivision of this state, which for the purpose of this title is a county or an incorporated municipality of this state, is authorized and empowered on behalf of such political subdivision to convey to the authority any real property or interest therein for any rights of way owned by such political subdivision, which is used at the time or may, upon completion of any action committed to the authority by this article, be used as a county road or an urban road if conveyed by a county or as an urban road if conveyed by an incorporated municipality. The consideration for such conveyance shall be determined by the governing authority of such political subdivision and expressed in the deed of conveyance. Such consideration, however, shall be nominal, the benefits flowing to the political subdivision and its citizens constituting full and adequate actual consideration. However, nothing in this subsection shall prevent the authority from reimbursing a political subdivision, as authorized in Code Section 32-10-6.

The board or its successors and the department are empowered to acquire, in any manner now permitted to them by law, and to expend funds available to them for such acquisition, real property, interests therein, or rights of way which upon acquisition may be conveyed by the Governor as above-provided to the authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 6; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 6; Code 1933, § 95A-1206, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1991, in subsection (b) “subdivision” was substituted for “subdivisions” in the next-to-last sentence and a comma was inserted following “However” in the last sentence; and, in subsection (c), “above-provided” was substituted for “above provided”.

32-10-6.
Reimbursement of counties and municipalities for property, interests, and rights of way conveyed to authority.

Notwithstanding any provisions of this article to the contrary, the authority is authorized to reimburse counties or incorporated municipalities, as a part of the construction cost of a project, for any real property or interest therein or any rights of way conveyed to the authority pursuant to this article, when such real property or interest therein or any rights of way are used as an urban road.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 826, § 2; Code 1933, § 95A-1207, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-7.
Letting of construction contracts by competitive bids.

All contracts of the authority for the construction of any project authorized by this article shall be let to the reliable bidder submitting the lowest sealed bid upon plans and specifications approved by the department, as set forth in Code Sections 32-2-64 through 32-2-72. However, subject to the restriction on the subletting of negotiated contracts as contained in Code Section 32-2-61, the authority may contract with any county or other political subdivision of the state for the construction of any project situated wholly or partly within such subdivision, upon agreed terms; but the work provided for by such contract shall be at unit prices which shall not exceed the average of the unit prices submitted in the immediately preceding 60 days by competitive bidders for similar work to the department or the authority, whichever may be lower, as determined and averaged by the chief engineer or his or her designated subordinate.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 9; Ga. L. 1961, p. 3, § 5; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 5; Code 1933, § 95A-1205, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32; Ga. L. 1994, p. 591, § 9.

32-10-8.
Initiation of projects; preliminary expenses; selection of projects.

Action by the authority with respect to any project or combination of projects shall be initiated as follows: The board, after investigation, shall by resolution recommend the undertaking to the authority with respect to a specific project or a group of projects of any action permitted by this article and deemed by the board to be desirable, in the public interest, and consistent with the purposes provided in subsection (b) of this Code section. The authority shall consider such request and may by resolution provide for undertaking and financing of all or any part of such recommended actions but it shall be under no duty to undertake or finance any of them.

The board is authorized to make and to expend any funds available to it for the purpose of making surveys, studies, and estimates in connection with formulating its recommendations to the authority; and it is further authorized to prepare, furnish, and expend its funds for the purpose of preparing all necessary plans and specifications and furnishing all engineering skill and supervision for any project or projects with respect to which the authority has undertaken or contemplates undertaking any action permitted by this article. The department shall keep an accurate record of such expenses which, if not reimbursed or paid for by the authority as permitted in subsection (d) of this Code section, shall be deemed proper and legitimate expenses of the board and department.

The surveys, plans, and specifications for any action taken by the authority with respect to any project shall be prepared by the department, and the engineering and construction supervision shall be performed by the department unless the board specifically authorizes the authority to do so with its own employees and agents. In any event, all such plans and specifications shall be approved by the chief engineer before work is entered upon pursuant to this subsection.

The authority may contract to reimburse the department for surveys, studies, estimates, plans, specifications, furnishing engineering skill and supervision, and for any other services permitted by this article from the proceeds of any issue of revenue bonds secured by the rentals of the project or group of projects with respect to which the services were rendered; and the same shall be considered as part of the cost of the project.

In selecting projects pursuant to this Code section, the board shall locate urban road projects according to a formula which will allocate to each urban incorporated municipality or urban county, as the case may be, a project or projects estimated to cost an amount approximately equal to the percentage of $100 million which 110 percent of the population of such urban incorporated municipality or which 100 percent of the population of such urban county, as the case may be, bears to the sum of the total population of all urban counties plus 110 percent of the total population of all urban incorporated municipalities except those in urban counties. As used in this subsection, the term “population” means the population figures according to the most recent official United States census. If any urban incorporated municipality or urban county fails to qualify for one or more of its projects, the board shall have full authority to substitute other projects; but such substituted project shall count in the formula allocation and the urban incorporated municipality or urban county which failed to qualify shall have a cumulative credit for the amount of such forfeited project.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, § 7; Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 7; Ga. L. 1961, p. 3, § 6; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 7; Ga. L. 1971, p. 385, § 8; Code 1933, § 95A-1208, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 591, § 10.

32-10-9.
Leasing of projects.

The authority, as lessor, is authorized to lease any project or group of projects to the state and the department as lessees; and the Governor on behalf of the state and the commissioner on behalf of the department are authorized to execute and enter upon such leases for the use of a project or group of projects by the state, the department, and the general public; and such leases may contain such of the terms and conditions hereinafter set forth in this Code section as may be applicable to the undertaking:

Said leases shall be for a term not in excess of 50 years;

The rental to be paid for the use of the project or projects shall be fixed by the authority and shall be calculated so as to enable the authority:

To pay the principal of and interest on the bonds, the proceeds of which have been or will be spent on the cost of the project or projects thus leased, including premiums, if any;

To comply with any sinking fund requirement contained in the indenture of trust securing such bonds;

To pay the cost of constructing, reconstructing, maintaining, repairing, and operating such project or projects;

To perform fully all of the provisions of the trust indenture securing the bonds to the payment of which such rental is pledged;

To pay the pro rata share of the reasonable and necessary administrative and operating expense of the authority, including any sum or sums that may be owed to the department as a result of expenditure made by the department under this article;

To accumulate any excess income which may be required by the bond purchasers or dictated by the requirements of achieving ready marketability and low interest rates of the bonds;

To pay any expenses in connection with the bond issue or project or group of projects, such as trustees’ fees, counsel fees, fiscal fees, and the like;

The rental shall be payable at such intervals as may be agreed upon and set forth in such lease, and any lease may provide for the commencement of rental payments to the authority prior to the completion of the undertaking of the authority with respect to any project or projects; and it may also provide for payment of rental during such times as the leased project or group of projects may be partially or wholly untenantable;

The lease may obligate the lessees to maintain and keep in good repair (including complete reconstruction, if necessary) the leased projects, regardless of the cause of the necessity for such maintenance, repair, or reconstruction. If such provision is included in any lease, the maintenance, repair, upkeep, and reconstruction, if necessary, shall be performed by the department, which is authorized to expend any sums legally available to it in carrying out such obligations. However, as to any project which is a county road, urban road, or state road, as defined in Code Section 32-10-1, which is not part of the state highway system, the duty of maintenance and repair shall rest upon the incorporated municipality within the limits of which lie any part of the project and upon the county for the remaining part of such project lying outside such limits, as in the case of other public roads of the county or of the municipality. Furthermore, if the entire project lies within the limits of the incorporated municipality, such municipality then shall have the duty of maintenance and repair of the entire project; and furthermore, if no part of said project lies within the limits of an incorporated municipality, the county shall have the duty of maintenance and repair of the entire project; and

The lease may obligate the lessees to indemnify and save harmless the authority from any and all injury and damage to persons or property occurring on or by reason of the leased premises and improvements thereon and to undertake at state expense the defense of any actions brought against the authority by reason of injury or damages to persons or property occurring on or by reason of the leased premises; and a lease may contain a similar obligation on the part of the county through which runs a project covered by the lease.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, § 8; Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 10; Ga. L. 1961, p. 3, § 7; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 8; Ga. L. 1971, p. 385, § 3; Code 1933, § 95A-1209, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-10.
Payment of rentals by lessees; enforcement of covenants and obligations; assignment of rentals by authority.

The rentals contracted to be paid by lessees to the authority under leases entered upon pursuant to this article shall constitute obligations of the state for the payment of which the good faith of the state is pledged. Such rentals shall be paid as provided in the lease contracts from funds appropriated for such purposes by the terms of the Constitution of Georgia. It shall be the duty of the Governor and the board to see to the punctual payment of all such rentals. In the event of any failure or refusal on the part of lessees punctually to perform any covenant or obligation contained in any lease entered upon pursuant to this article, the authority may enforce performance by any legal or equitable process against lessees; and consent is given for the institution of any such action.

The authority shall be permitted to assign to a trustee or paying agent any rental due it by the lessees, as may be required by the terms of any trust indenture entered into by the authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 13; Ga. L. 1961, p. 3, § 9; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 11; Code 1933, § 95A-1212, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-11.
Cessation of rentals; transfer of projects.

When each and all of the bonds, interest coupons, and obligations of every nature whatsoever, for the payment of which the revenues of any given project or projects have been pledged, in whole or in part, either originally or subsequently, either primarily or secondarily, directly or indirectly, or otherwise, have been paid in full, or a sufficient amount for the payment of all such bonds and other obligations and the interest thereon to the maturity thereof shall have been set aside in trust for the benefit of such bondholders or other obligees, such project or projects shall henceforth be maintained, free from any and all rental consideration, by the department, if part of the state highway system; and, if a county road or an urban road, then by the political subdivision which under paragraph (4) of Code Section 32-10-9 had the duty to maintain the project prior to the cessation of rentals, provided that, upon the cessation of rentals upon any given project, the authority may convey by deed all right, title, and interest in and to such project to the department as part of the state highway system; and, if not part of the state highway system, then to the political subdivision having maintenance responsibility for the project under this Code section; and provided, further, that the department shall maintain and keep in repair such free project or projects as are a part of the state highway system.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, § 10; Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 11; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 10; Ga. L. 1971, p. 385, § 5; Code 1933, § 95A-1211, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-12.
Designation of projects as part of county and municipal public road systems and as part of state highway system.

Each county or urban road project leased by the authority to the state and the department, upon completion of the action with respect thereto undertaken by the authority, shall be a part of the system of public roads of the state and of the county or counties or incorporated municipality or municipalities wherein the project is located; but no such project shall become a part of the state highway system until designated as such as provided by law.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 12; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 9; Ga. L. 1971, p. 385, § 9; Code 1933, § 95A-1210, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-13.
Composition of authority’s fund; purposes for which fund may be pledged or utilized.

All revenues in excess of all obligations of the authority, of every nature, which are not otherwise pledged or restricted as to disposition and use by the terms of any trust indenture entered into by the authority for the security of bonds issued under this article, together with all receipts and gifts of every kind and nature whatsoever, shall be and become the authority fund. The authority, in its discretion, shall pledge or utilize the authority fund for any one or more of the following purposes:

Pledges to the payment of any bond issue requirements, sinking or reserve funds, as may be provided for under the terms of this article;

Payment of any outstanding unpaid bond obligations or administrative expenses;

The construction of any project requested by the board, the cost of which may amount to a sum less than the accumulated balance of such fund;

The most advantageous obtainable purchase redemption and retirement of the authority’s bonds pursuant to privileges accorded to the authority in the various issues of bonds outstanding;

The most advantageous open market purchase of the authority’s bonds that it may accomplish; or

Investment in obligations of the United States government or obligations of agencies of the United States government, the payment of which is guaranteed by the United States government, of guaranteed convertibility or maturity not in excess of two years, provided that funds so invested and income from such investments shall always be available to and ultimately expended for other purposes set forth in this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, § 12; Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 14; Ga. L. 1961, p. 3, § 10; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 12; Code 1933, § 95A-1213, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 32.

32-10-14.
Designation of moneys received pursuant to article as trust funds.

All moneys received pursuant to this article, whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds or as revenues, tolls, and earnings, shall be deemed trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this article; and the bondholders paying or entitled to receive the benefit of such funds shall have a lien on all such funds until applied as provided for in any resolution or trust indentures of the authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, § 35; Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 36; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 35; Code 1933, § 95A-1235, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-15.
Effect of article.

This article shall be deemed to provide an additional and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized in this article, shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws, and shall not be regarded as in derogation of any powers now existing.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, § 36; Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 37; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 36; Code 1933, § 95A-1236, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-16.
Construction of article.

This article, being for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, § 37; Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 38; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 37; Code 1933, § 95A-1237, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 32.